test/src/morphology/izh-test-N-kana_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - kana: # Noun 'chicken'
     kana+N+Sg+Nom: kana
     kana+N+Sg+Gen: kanan
     kana+N+Sg+Acc: kanan
     kana+N+Sg+Part: kannaa
     kana+N+Sg+Ill: kannaa
     kana+N+Sg+Ine: kanas
     kana+N+Sg+Ela: kanast
     kana+N+Sg+All: kanalle
     kana+N+Sg+Ade: kanal
     kana+N+Sg+Abl: kanalt
     kana+N+Sg+Tra: kanaks
     kana+N+Sg+Ess: kananna
     kana+N+Sg+Exe: kanant

     kana+N+Pl+Nom: kanat
     kana+N+Pl+Gen: kannoin
     kana+N+Pl+Acc: kanat
     kana+N+Pl+Part: kannoja
     kana+N+Pl+Ill: kannoi
     kana+N+Pl+Ine: kanois
     kana+N+Pl+Ela: kanoist
     kana+N+Pl+All: kanoille
     kana+N+Pl+Ade: kanoil
     kana+N+Pl+Abl: kanoilt
     kana+N+Pl+Tra: kanoiks
     kana+N+Pl+Ess: kanoinna
     kana+N+Pl+Exe: kanoint
